src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON RONDANE-LOAN !!= @CODE@ Only nominative.Place names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:e%> RONDANEDECL-LOAN ;

!!€gt-norm: Azorene # Even-syllable test
!!€ Azorene:               Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!$ Azorenij:              Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill # Negative test


LEXICON RONDANE-SG-LOAN !!= @CODE@ Only nominative. Place names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:e%> RONDANEDECL-LOAN ;


LEXICON RONDANE-sur !!= @CODE@ Surnames
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:e%> RONDANEDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Benneche # Even-syllable test
!!€ Benneche:               Benneche+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom
!!€ Bennechij:              Benneche+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill
!!€ Benneches:              Benneche+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela

LEXICON RONDANE-obj !!= @CODE@ Objects
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:e%> RONDANEDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Office # Even-syllable test
!!€ Office:              Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom
!!€ Office:              Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen
!!€ Officev:             Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc
!!€ Officen:             Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine
!!€ Officij:             Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill
!!€ Offices:             Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela
!!€ Officijn:            Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com

LEXICON RONDANE-org !!= @CODE@ Organizations
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:e%> RONDANEDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Picture # Even-syllable test
!!€ Picture:               Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!€ Picturij:              Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
!!€ Pictures:              Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela

LEXICON RONDANE-mal !!= @CODE@ Male names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:e%> RONDANEDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Lawrence # Even-syllable test
!!€ Lawrence:               Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!€ Lawrencij:              Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill
!!€ Lawrences:              Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela

LEXICON RONDANE-fem !!= @CODE@ Female names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:e%> RONDANEDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Jannike # Even-syllable test
!!€ Jannike:               Jannike+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom
!!€ Jannikij:              Jannike+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill
!!€ Jannikes:              Jannike+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela

LEXICON RONDANEDECL
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-DC ;

LEXICON RONDANEDECL-ORG
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-DC-ORG ;

LEXICON RONDANEDECL-LOAN
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-DC-LOAN ;


LEXICON RONDANE-DC
         +Sg+Nom:      K     ;
         +Sg+Nom:      RHyph ;
            +Ess:n     K     ;
         +Sg+Ill:Q4j   K     ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Sg+Gen:      K     ;
         +Sg+Gen:      RHyph ;
         +Sg+Acc:v     K     ;
         +Sg+Ine:n     K     ;
         +Sg+Ela:s     K     ;
         +Pl+Nom:      K     ;
         +Pl+Gen:Q4j   K     ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Pl+Gen:Q4j   K     ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Pl+Acc:Q4jt  K     ;
         +Pl+Ill:Q4jda K     ;
         +Pl+Ine:Q4jn  K     ;
         +Pl+Ela:Q4js  K     ;
         +Pl+Com:Q4j   K     ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Sg+Com:Q4jn  K     ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn  K     ; ! Norgejn

LEXICON RONDANE-DC-ORG
         +Sg+Nom:     K     ;
         +Sg+Nom:     RHyph ;
            +Ess:n    K     ;
         +Sg+Ill:Q4j  K     ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Sg+Gen:     K     ;
         +Sg+Gen:     RHyph ;
         +Sg+Acc:v    K     ;
         +Sg+Ine:n    K     ;
         +Sg+Ela:s    K     ;
! +Pl+Nom: K ;
! +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
! +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
! +Pl+Acc:Q4jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:Q4jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:Q4jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:Q4js K ;
! +Pl+Com:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Sg+Com:Q4jn K     ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn K     ; ! Norgejn


LEXICON RONDANE-DC-LOAN
         +Sg+Nom:     K     ;
         +Sg+Nom:     RHyph ;
    +Ess+Err/Orth:n    K     ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:Q4j  K     ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:     K     ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:     RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:v    K     ;
 +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:n    K     ;
 +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:s    K     ;
! +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth: K ;
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
! +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:Q4jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:Q4jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine+Err/Orth:Q4jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela+Err/Orth:Q4js K ;
! +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:Q4jn K     ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn K     ; ! !SUB Norgejn

!! GATA are Norwegian place names that end on -gata. Gets even-syllable casemarking. Last syllable is unstressed. Non-assimilated stems.

LEXICON GATA-plc  !!= @CODE@ Norwegian place names that end on -gata. Gets even-syllable casemarking. Last syllable is unstressed.
     +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:gata ACCRADECL-PLC ;

!!€gt-norm: Munkegata # Even-syllable test
!!€ Munkegata:               Munkegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Munkegataj:              Munkegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Munkegatas:              Munkegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela

!! Betfage are place names like ACCRA, but for e-final names with illative sub form -ej and normative form -ij.  Last syllable is unstressed. Non-assmilated stems.

LEXICON BETFAGE-plc  !!= @CODE@ Place names Like ACCRA but with sub: -ej, and NORM: -ij. Only singular.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:e%> BETFAGEDECL-PLC ;

!!€gt-norm: Betfage # Even-syllable test
!!€ Betfage:               Betfage+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!!€ Betfagej              Betfage+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth !not generated in the normative analyzer
!!€ Betfagij:              Betfage+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Betfages:              Betfage+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela

!!€gt-desc: Betfage # Even-syllable test
!!€ Betfagej:              Betfage+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth

LEXICON BETFAGE-fem  !!= @CODE@ Female names
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:e%>                BETFAGEDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:e%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #           ;

!!€gt-norm: Foibe # Even-syllable test
!!€ Foibe:               Foibe+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom
!!!€ Foibej              Foibe+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth !not generated in the normative analyzer
!!€ Foibij:              Foibe+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill
!!€ Foibes:              Foibe+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela

!!€gt-desc: Foibe # Even-syllable test
!!€ Foibej:              Foibe+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth

LEXICON BETFAGE-mal  !!= @CODE@ Male names
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:e%>                BETFAGEDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:e%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #           ;

!!€gt-norm: Manasse # Even-syllable test
!!€ Manasse:               Manasse+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!!€ Manassej              Manasse+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth !not generated in the normative analyzer
!!€ Manassij:              Manasse+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill !gives Manassej, for some reason - could it be something with the stem consonants?
!!€ Manasses:              Manasse+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela

!!€gt-desc: Manasse # Even-syllable test
!!€ Manassej:              Manasse+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth

LEXICON BETFAGEDECL
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BETFAGE-DC ;

LEXICON BETFAGEDECL-PLC
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BETFAGE-DC ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ       ; ! XXX Sub?

LEXICON BETFAGEDECL-ORG
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BETFAGE-DC-ORG ;
