src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Betfage BETFAGE-plc ;
Derbe BETFAGE-plc ;
Foibe BETFAGE-fem ;
Joppe BETFAGE-plc ;
Manasse BETFAGE-mal ;
Mitylene BETFAGE-plc ;
Perge BETFAGE-plc ;
Samotrake BETFAGE-plc ;
Tessalonike BETFAGE-plc ;
